Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Provisions Applicable to All Proceedings

§ 43-21-201.
Representation by counsel; youth court-appointed attorneys required to receive juvenile justice training; exemption; duties of youth court counsel.

Each party shall have the right to be represented by counsel at all stages of the proceedings including, but not limited to, detention, adjudicatory and disposition hearings and parole or probation revocation proceedings. In delinquency matters the court shall appoint legal defense counsel who is not also a guardian ad litem for the same child. If the party is a child, the child shall be represented by counsel at all critical stages: detention, adjudicatory and disposition hearings; parole or probation revocation proceedings; and post-disposition matters. If indigent, the child shall have the right to have counsel appointed for him by the youth court.

When a party first appears before the youth court, the judge shall ascertain whether he is represented by counsel and, if not, inform him of his rights including his right to counsel. If the court determines that a parent or guardian who is a party in an abuse, neglect or termination of parental rights proceeding is indigent, the youth court judge may appoint counsel to represent the indigent parent or guardian in the proceeding.

An attorney appointed to represent a delinquent child shall be required to complete annual juvenile justice training that is approved by the Mississippi Office of State Public Defender and the Mississippi Commission on Continuing Legal Education. An attorney appointed to represent a parent or guardian in an abuse, neglect or termination of parental rights proceeding shall be required to complete annual training that is approved by the Office of State Public Defender and the Mississippi Commission on Continuing Legal Education. The Mississippi Office of State Public Defender and the Mississippi Commission on Continuing Legal Education shall determine the amount of juvenile justice training and continuing education required to fulfill the requirements of this subsection. The State Public Defender shall maintain a roll of attorneys who have complied with the training requirements and shall enforce the provisions of this subsection. Should an attorney fail to complete the annual training requirement or fail to attend the required training within six (6) months of being appointed to a youth court case, the attorney shall be disqualified to serve and the youth court shall immediately terminate the representation and appoint another attorney. Attorneys appointed by a youth court to five (5) or fewer cases a year are exempt from the requirements of this subsection.

The child’s attorney shall owe the same duties of undivided loyalty, confidentiality and competent representation to the child or minor as is due an adult client pursuant to the Mississippi Rules of Professional Conduct.

An attorney shall enter his appearance on behalf of a party in the proceeding by filing a written notice of appearance with the youth court, by filing a pleading, notice or motion signed by counsel or by appearing in open court and advising the youth court that he is representing a party. After counsel has entered his appearance, he shall be served with copies of all subsequent pleadings, motions and notices required to be served on the party he represents. An attorney who has entered his appearance shall not be permitted to withdraw from the case until a timely appeal, if any, has been decided, except by leave of the court then exercising jurisdiction of the cause after notice of his intended withdrawal is served by him on the party he represents.

Each designee appointed by a youth court judge shall be subject to the Code of Judicial Conduct and shall govern himself or herself accordingly.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 20; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 8; Laws, 2006, ch. 539, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 347, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 481, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 505, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 43-21-203.
Conduct of proceedings.

The youth court shall be in session at all times.

All cases involving children shall be heard at any place the judge deems suitable but separately from the trial of cases involving adults.

Hearings in all cases involving children shall be conducted without a jury and may be recessed from time to time.

All hearings shall be conducted under such rules of evidence and rules of court as may comply with applicable constitutional standards.

No proceeding by the youth court in cases involving children shall be a criminal proceeding but shall be entirely of a civil nature.

The general public shall be excluded from the hearing, and only those persons shall be admitted who are found by the youth court to have a direct interest in the cause or work of the youth court. Any person found by the youth court to have a direct interest in the cause shall have the right to appear and be represented by legal counsel.

In all hearings, a complete record of all evidence shall be taken by stenographic reporting, by mechanical or electronic device or by some combination thereof.

The youth court may exclude the attendance of a child from a hearing in neglect and abuse cases with consent of the child’s counsel. The youth court may exclude the attendance of a child from any portion of a disposition hearing that would be injurious to the best interest of the child in delinquency and children in need of supervision cases with consent of the child’s counsel.

All parties to a youth court cause shall have the right at any hearing in which an investigation, record or report is admitted in evidence:

To subpoena, confront and examine the person who prepared or furnished data for the report; and

To introduce evidence controverting the contents of the report.

Except as provided by Section 43-21-561(5) or as otherwise provided by this chapter, the disposition of a child’s cause or any evidence given in the youth court in any proceedings concerning the child shall not be admissible against the child in any case or proceeding in any court other than a youth court.

An order or ruling of the youth court judge delivered orally must be reduced to writing within forty-eight (48) hours, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and statutory state holidays.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 21; Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1980; Laws, 2019, ch. 464, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 43-21-205.
Court costs and fees.

In proceedings under this chapter, no court costs shall be charged against any party to a petition, and no salaried officer of the state, county or any municipality, nor any youth court counselor, nor any witness other than an expert witness shall be entitled to receive any fee for any service rendered to the youth court or for attendance in the youth court in any proceedings under this chapter; but the fees of the circuit and chancery clerks in youth court cases originating by petition shall be paid as is provided by law for like services in other cases and shall be paid by the county on allowance of the board of supervisors on an itemized cost bill approved by the judge. These costs shall be paid out of the general fund. No clerk shall be allowed compensation for attendance in youth court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 506, § 22; Laws, 1999, ch. 400, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§ 43-21-207.
Admissibility of statements made by or information obtained from child during screening, assessment or treatment.

No statements, admissions or confessions made by or incriminatory information obtained from a child in the course of a screening or assessment that is undertaken in conjunction with any proceedings under this chapter, including, but not limited to, that which is court-ordered, shall be admitted into evidence against the child on the issue of whether the child committed a delinquent act under the Youth Court Act or on the issue of guilt in any criminal proceedings.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section are in addition to and do not override any existing statutory and constitutional prohibition on the admission into evidence in delinquency or criminal proceedings of information obtained during screening, assessment or treatment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2016, ch. 438, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2016.